src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-moksís_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - moksisa - ok : # -m animate noun, awl AEW NA1
     moksisa+NA+Sg: moksisa
     moksisa+NA+Pl: moksiiksi
     moksisa+NA+Obv: moksisi
     moksisa+NA+Non: moksii
     
     moksisa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ noksisa, noksiima ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ noksiiksi, noksiimiksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ noksisi, noksiimi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ noksii, noksiimi ]
     
     moksisa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ noksinnaana, noksiiminnaana ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ noksinnaaniksi, noksiiminnaaniksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ noksinnaani, noksiiminnaani ]
     moksisa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ noksinnaani, noksiiminnaani ]

     moksisa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ koksinnoona, koksiiminnoona ]
     moksisa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ koksinnooniksi, koksiiminnooniksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ koksinnooni, koksiiminnooni ]
     moksisa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ koksinnooni, koksiiminnooni ]

     moksisa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ koksisa, koksiima ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ koksiiksi, koksiimiksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ koksisi, koksiimi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ koksii, koksiimi ]

     moksisa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ koksoaawa, koksiimoaawa ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ koksoaawaiksi, koksiimoaawaiksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ koksoaawayi, koksiimoaawayi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ koksoaawai, koksiimoaawai ]

     moksisa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ oksiiksi, oksiimiksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ oksisi, oksiimi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ oksii, oksiimi ]

     moksisa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ oksoaawaiksi, oksiimoaawaiksi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ oksoaawayi, oksiimoaawayi ]
     moksisa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ oksoaawai, oksiimoaawai ]
     
     PS/omahk+moksisa+NA+Pl: omahkoksiiksi 
